Idaho, session 2026, S1335.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-3731, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-3731. CONTRACT REQUIREMENTS FOR STATE-SUPPORTED MEDICAL STUDENTS
-- HUMAN MEDICAL EDUCATION REIMBURSEMENT FUND.
(1)(a) An individual who qualifies as an Idaho resident pursuant to
section 33-3717B, Idaho Code, and who is accepted into a human medical
or veterinary education program enrolling Idaho students supported by
Idaho state funds in slots reserved for Idaho students shall, before
confirming enrollment in such program or school, enter into a contract
with the state board of education or the board's designee, which.
(b) For human medical and veterinary students, such contract shall
specify that the individual will commit to entering active full-time
professional practice in Idaho for a period of four (4) years within one
(1) year of:
(a) (i) Obtaining a license to practice medicine;
(b) (ii) Finishing a residency or subspecialty residency; or
(c) (iii) Finishing a human medical or veterinary education fel-
lowship as defined by the state board of education or the board's
designee.
(c) For veterinary education students beginning the 2027-2028 aca-
demic year, the contract shall specify that the individual will commit
to a course of study and subsequent service that includes mixed prac-
tice agricultural animal veterinary medicine. The contract shall also
require that no less than six hundred (600) hours of annual full-time
clinical practice during the four (4) years of full-time professional
practice shall be devoted to providing veterinary services to agricul-
tural animals. Compliance with this requirement shall be reviewed on an
annual basis.
(d) For purposes of this section, the term "agricultural animal" shall
include cattle, sheep, goats, and swine.
(2) Each year of a human medical or veterinary medicine residency
served in Idaho, up to four (4) years, will be credited as one-half (1/2) year
of the practice requirement provided in subsection (1) of this section. For
veterinary education students, such residency training shall require that a
majority of time be devoted to mixed practice agricultural animal veterinary
medicine. After the fourth year, no credit shall be given for any additional
residency years.


(3) An individual who fails to abide by the contract described in sub-
section (1) of this section shall reimburse the state for the state's fi-
nancial obligation in supporting the individual's human medical or veteri-
nary medicine education, as determined by the state board of education or the
board's designee. Reimbursement must:
(a) Begin within one (1) year of:
(i) Obtaining a license to practice medicine;
(ii) Finishing a residency or subspecialty residency; or
(iii) Finishing a human medical or veterinary education fellow-
ship as defined by the state board of education or the board's de-
signee;
(b) Be paid according to an amortized schedule established by the state
board of education or the board's designee; and
(c) Be completed within eight (8) years of the date the reimbursement
requirement began.
(4) The reimbursement obligation described in subsection (3) of this
section:
(a) Shall not accrue any interest; and
(b) May, by act of the state board of education or the board's designee,
be:
(i) Suspended if reimbursement is temporarily impossible or
would create extreme hardship for a temporary period, including
but not limited to suspension for medical reasons, personal rea-
sons, parental leave, or call to active duty in the armed forces;
or
(ii) Waived if:
1. Reimbursement is permanently impossible or would create
extreme hardship, including but not limited to death, in-
ability to complete the program, or inability to obtain a li-
cense to practice medicine; or
2. The individual owing reimbursement is participating in
a program of the federal government or United States armed
forces that has a service requirement.
(5) The provisions of this section shall apply to individuals matricu-
lating in a medical education program enrolling Idaho students supported by
Idaho state funds in slots reserved for Idaho human medical students in fall
2023 and thereafter and to individuals matriculating in a veterinary edu-
cation program enrolling Idaho students supported by Idaho state funds in
slots reserved for Idaho veterinary students in fall 2027 and thereafter.
(6) There is hereby established in the state treasury a medical educa-
tion reimbursement fund, which shall be administered by the state board of
education or the board's designee. Moneys in the fund shall:
(a) Consist of:
(i) Reimbursement paid pursuant to subsection (3) of this sec-
tion;
(ii) Legislative appropriations;
(iii) Donations; and
(iv) Interest earned on idle moneys in the fund; and
(b) Be used for, subject to availability:


(i) The costs of administering and enforcing the provisions of
this section; and
(ii) Incentive grants in an amount and according to a pro-
gram established under state board of education policy. Such
grants shall be awarded to licensed physicians who practice
human medicine or licensed veterinarians who practice veterinary
medicine in Idaho and who meet other criteria provided in board
policy.
(7) The state board of education is authorized to take such actions as
are necessary to effectuate the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.